Arkansas, session 2025, SB2.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-7-136 is repealed.
20-7-136. Statewide fluoridation program — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “water system” means a facility including
without limitation a parent system, consecutive system, or other system that
holds, treats, and supplies water directly or through a consecutive system or
consecutive systems to five thousand (5,000) persons or more.
(b) The company, corporation, municipality, county, government agency,
or other entity that owns or controls a water system shall control the
quantity of fluoride in the water so as to maintain a fluoride content
established by the Department of Health.
(c) The State Board of Health shall adopt rules relating to the
fluoridation of water systems that shall include without limitation:
(1) Permissible concentrations of fluoride to be maintained by a
water system; and
(2) Requirements and procedures for maintaining permissible
*JMB015*
11/20/2024 8:47:01 AM JMB015

SB2
concentrations of fluoride including without limitation:
(A) Necessary equipment;
(B) Recordkeeping;
(C) Reporting; and
(D) Testing.
(d)(1) A water system required to fluoridate under this section is not
required to comply with the requirements of this section until funds
sufficient to pay capital start-up costs for fluoridation equipment for the
system have become available from any source other than tax revenue or
service revenue regularly collected by the company, corporation,
municipality, county, or other government agency that owns or controls the
water system.
(2) A licensed civil engineer recognized or employed by the
department who is familiar with the design, construction, operation, and
maintenance of fluoridation systems shall determine for the department
whether the capital start-up costs claimed under subdivision (d)(1) of this
section are reasonable.
(e) A water system for a city in this state that receives its water
supply from a community in another state is not required to comply with this
section until a substantially similar fluoridation program is enacted for the
water system of the community in the other state.















11/20/2024 8:47:01 AM